Utah statutes.
58-5a-301.   License required -- License classifications.

(1)  The division shall issue to persons qualified under this chapter a license in the classification of podiatric physician.

(2)  A person may not practice podiatry unless licensed or exempted from licensure under this chapter.



Amended by Chapter 232, 1996 General Session

